dictionaries/ennl.aff
FLAG long
SFX 9 Y 33
SFX 9 0 tizer a 
SFX 9 e izer [^l]e 
SFX 9 le ilizer [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 e izer [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 um izer um 
SFX 9 0 izer [^u]m 
SFX 9 s zer is 
SFX 9 0 izer [^i]s 
SFX 9 y izer [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer [^aemsy] 
SFX 9 0 tizers a 
SFX 9 e izers [^l]e 
SFX 9 le ilizers [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 e izers [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 um izers um 
SFX 9 0 izers [^u]m 
SFX 9 s zers is 
SFX 9 0 izers [^i]s 
SFX 9 y izers [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izers [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izers [^aemsy] 
SFX 9 0 tizer's a 
SFX 9 e izer's [^l]e 
SFX 9 le ilizer's [^aeiou]le 
SFX 9 e izer's [aeiou]le 
SFX 9 um izer's um 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^u]m 
SFX 9 s zer's is 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^i]s 
SFX 9 y izer's [^aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer's [aeiou]y 
SFX 9 0 izer's [^aemsy] 
SFX t Y 22
SFX t 0 tisable a 
SFX t e isable [^l]e 
SFX t le ilisable [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e isable [aeiou]le 
SFX t um isable um 
SFX t 0 isable [^u]m 
SFX t s sable is 
SFX t 0 isable [^i]s 
SFX t y isable [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isable [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isable [^aemsy] 
SFX t 0 tisability a 
SFX t e isability [^l]e 
SFX t le ilisability [^aeiou]le 
SFX t e isability [aeiou]le 
SFX t um isability um 
SFX t 0 isability [^u]m 
SFX t s sability is 
SFX t 0 isability [^i]s 
SFX t y isability [^aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isability [aeiou]y 
SFX t 0 isability [^aemsy] 
SFX + Y 22
SFX + 0 tizable a 
SFX + e izable [^l]e 
SFX + le ilizable [^aeiou]le 
SFX + e izable [aeiou]le 
SFX + um izable um 
SFX + 0 izable [^u]m 
SFX + s zable is 
SFX + 0 izable [^i]s 
SFX + y izable [^aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izable [aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izable [^aemsy] 
SFX + 0 tizability a 
SFX + e izability [^l]e 
SFX + le ilizability [^aeiou]le 
SFX + e izability [aeiou]le 
SFX + um izability um 
SFX + 0 izability [^u]m 
SFX + s zability is 
SFX + 0 izability [^i]s 
SFX + y izability [^aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izability [aeiou]y 
SFX + 0 izability [^aemsy] 
SFX M Y 1
SFX M 0 's . 
SFX B Y 48
SFX B e able [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 able [acegilou]e 
SFX B te ble ate 
SFX B e able [^a]te 
SFX B 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX B 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX B e ability [^acegilotu]e 
SFX B 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX B te bility ate 
SFX B e ability [^a]te 
SFX B 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX B 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX B 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX B 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX B 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX B 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX B 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX B 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX B 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX B 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX B 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX B 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX B 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX B 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX B y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX B 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX 7 Y 9
SFX 7 e able [acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 able [^acegilou]e 
SFX 7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 0 able [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX 7 y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX 7 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX 7 0 able [^cely] 
SFX g Y 9
SFX g e ability [^acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX g 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX g 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX g 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX g 0 ability [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX g y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX g 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX g 0 ability [^cely] 
SFX l Y 9
SFX l e ably [^acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 ably [acegilou]e 
SFX l 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX l 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX l 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX l 0 ably [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX l y iably [^aeiou]y 
SFX l 0 ably [aeiou]y 
SFX l 0 ably [^cely] 
SFX b Y 3
SFX b e ible [^aeiou]e 
SFX b 0 ible [aeiou]e 
SFX b 0 ible [^e] 
SFX L Y 12
SFX L 0 ament m 
SFX L y iment [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment [^my] 
SFX L 0 aments m 
SFX L y iments [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ments [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ments [^my] 
SFX L 0 ament's m 
SFX L y iment's [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment's [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment's [^my] 
SFX Z Y 30
SFX Z ic y dic
SFX Z e y [^aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 y [aeiouy]e
SFX Z 0 ey [aiouy]
SFX Z 0 by [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX Z 0 ky [^adeio][aeiou]c
SFX Z 0 dy [^aegio][aeiou]d
SFX Z 0 fy [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX Z 0 gy [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX Z 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX Z 0 ly [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX Z 0 my [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX Z 0 ny [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX Z 0 py [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX Z 0 ry [^aegilost][aiou]r
SFX Z 0 ry lur
SFX Z 0 ry tar
SFX Z 0 y [^aceiglmopt][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [gl][a]r
SFX Z 0 y [st]or
SFX Z 0 y ged
SFX Z 0 sy [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX Z 0 ty [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX Z 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX Z 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX Z 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX Z 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprtvz]
SFX Z 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX Z 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz]
SFX Z 0 ity ous
SFX 2 Y 63
SFX 2 e iness [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 e inesses [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 inesses [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 binesses [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 kinesses [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 dinesses [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 finesses [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 ginesses [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 kinesses [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 linesses [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 minesses [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 ninesses [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 pinesses [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 rinesses [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 sinesses [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 tinesses [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 vinesses [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 zinesses [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 inesses [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 inesses [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 e iness's [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness's [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 biness's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 kiness's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 diness's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 finess's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 giness's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 kiness's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 liness's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 miness's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 niness's [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 piness's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 riness's [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 siness's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 tiness's [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 viness's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 ziness's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 iness's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX z Y 24
SFX z e ily [^aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [aiou]y 
SFX z ey ily ey 
SFX z y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX z 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX z 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX z 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX z 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX z 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX z 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX z 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX z 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX z 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX z 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX z 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX z 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX z 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX z 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX z 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX y Y 15
SFX y e ory te 
SFX y e atory [mr]e 
SFX y e ary se 
SFX y 0 ry [^mrst]e 
SFX y 0 ory [^aeous]t 
SFX y 0 ry [aeous]t 
SFX y 0 ery h 
SFX y 0 atory [^i]m 
SFX y im matory im 
SFX y 0 ory s 
SFX y 0 ary ion 
SFX y 0 ry [^i]on 
SFX y 0 nery [aiu]n 
SFX y 0 ry [^aiou]n 
SFX y 0 ry [^ehmstn] 
SFX O Y 22
SFX O 0 al ch[ei]
SFX O 0 al te
SFX O 0 al [eimru][bn]
SFX O 0 al ss
SFX O 0 al it
SFX O 0 al [nt]ant
SFX O 0 al [ghiorstx][ao]n
SFX O 0 al [eo]nt
SFX O 0 al as
SFX O 0 l a
SFX O 0 al [cos]t
SFX O 0 ial eon
SFX O 0 al [cdghmpwx]
SFX O 0 ial r
SFX O e ial [ai]ge
SFX O e ial ice
SFX O 0 tal ut
SFX O e inal ude
SFX O e al [mnrsv]e
SFX O e al [aioy][dp]e
SFX O e al uge
SFX O y ial y
SFX o Y 12
SFX o 0 lly a 
SFX o e ally [^bcgv]e 
SFX o e ially [bcgv]e 
SFX o 0 ially [bcrx] 
SFX o um ally um 
SFX o 0 ally [^u]m 
SFX o y ally ty 
SFX o y ially [^t]y 
SFX o 0 ually [px]t 
SFX o 0 tally [iu]t 
SFX o 0 ally [^ipux]t 
SFX o 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX W Y 25
SFX W ce tific ce 
SFX W e atic me 
SFX W se tic se 
SFX W le ic ble 
SFX W e ic [^b]le 
SFX W e ic [^clms]e 
SFX W 0 lic [^x][ay]l 
SFX W 0 ic [x][ay]l 
SFX W 0 ic [^ay]l 
SFX W us ic us 
SFX W 0 tic [^u]s 
SFX W er ric [^hm]er 
SFX W 0 ic [^e]r 
SFX W 0 atic [aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 ic [^aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 tic ma 
SFX W a ic [^im]a 
SFX W a c [i]a 
SFX W y etic thy 
SFX W y ic [^t]hy 
SFX W y tic sy 
SFX W y ic [^hs]y 
SFX W 0 ic [^aeilmrsy] 
SFX W 0 ic [hm]er 
SFX W 0 c [dghlmsz]i 
SFX w Y 9
SFX w e ical e 
SFX w er rical er 
SFX w 0 ical [^e]r 
SFX w 0 atical [aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 ical [^aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 tical ma 
SFX w a ical [^m]a 
SFX w y ical y 
SFX w 0 ical [^aemry] 
SFX 1 Y 9
SFX 1 e ically e 
SFX 1 er rically er 
SFX 1 0 ically [^e]r 
SFX 1 0 atically [aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 tically ma 
SFX 1 a ically [^m]a 
SFX 1 y ically y 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aemry] 
SFX 3 Y 24
SFX 3 e ist [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tist ce 
SFX 3 0 ist [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist apy
SFX 3 y ist [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist [^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ist o 
SFX 3 0 ist [^eoy] 
SFX 3 e ists [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tists ce 
SFX 3 0 ists [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ists apy 
SFX 3 y ists [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ists [^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ists o 
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX 3 e ist's [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tist's ce 
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist's apy 
SFX 3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist's [^a][aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ist's o 
SFX 3 0 ist's [^eoy] 
